Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.190

Charter contracts—Renewal.

(1) A charter contract may be renewed by the authorizer, at the request of the charter school, for successive five-year terms. The authorizer, however, may vary the term based on the performance, demonstrated capacities, and particular circumstances of a charter school, and may grant renewal with specific conditions for necessary improvements to a charter school.

(2) No later than six months before the expiration of a charter contract, the authorizer must issue a performance report and charter contract renewal application guidance to the charter school. The performance report must summarize the charter school's performance record to date based on the data required by the charter contract, and must provide notice of any weaknesses or concerns perceived by the authorizer concerning the charter school that may, if not timely rectified, jeopardize its position in seeking renewal. The charter school has thirty days to respond to the performance report and submit any corrections or clarifications for the report.

(3) The renewal application guidance must, at a minimum, provide an opportunity for the charter school to:

(a) Present additional evidence, beyond the data contained in the performance report, supporting its case for charter contract renewal;

(b) Describe improvements undertaken or planned for the school; and

(c) Detail the school's plans for the next charter contract term.

(4) The renewal application guidance must include or refer explicitly to the criteria that will guide the authorizer's renewal decisions, and this criteria must be based on the performance framework set forth in the charter contract.

(5) In making charter renewal decisions, an authorizer must:

(a) Hold the charter school board accountable for: Ensuring that students of the charter school have opportunities for academic success; and exercising effective educational, operational, and financial oversight of the charter school;

(b) Base its decisions in evidence of the school's performance over the term of the charter contract in accordance with the performance framework set forth in the charter contract;

(c) Ensure that data used in making renewal decisions are available to the school and the public; and

(d) Provide a public report summarizing the evidence basis for its decision.

[ 2023 c 356 s 9; 2016 c 241 s 119. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 219 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 356: See note following RCW 28A.710.030.